Massachusetts, session 194th, H4505.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The county of Nantucket is hereby authorized to convey School Street, as
shown on a plan of land entitled “Plan of Taking for Nantucket County Commissioners School
Street in Nantucket (Surfside) MA.,” dated May 26, 1981, prepared by John J. Shugrue, Inc.,
recorded with Nantucket County Registry of Deeds in Plan Book 12-C-1, owned by the county
of Nantucket to the town of Nantucket for purposes of conveyance.
Any such disposition shall be on such terms and conditions as the Select Board deem
appropriate, which may include the reservation of restrictions and easements, all as shown on a
map on file with the office of the town clerk.
of 2

SECTION 2. The provisions of Chapter 30B of the Massachusetts General Laws and any
rights of first refusal in the Commonwealth under the provisions of Section 14 of Chapter 34 of
the Massachusetts General laws shall not be applicable to any conveyance authorized hereunder.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2